languages/apertium-nld/apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="sch/uilen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>uil</l>       <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uilt</l>      <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uilen</l>     <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uilen</l>     <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olen</l>      <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ool</l>       <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ool</l>       <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ool</l>       <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uilend</l>    <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uilen</l>     <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uil</l>       <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uilt</l>      <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uilt</l>      <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uilen</l>     <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uile</l>      <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uile</l>      <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uile</l>      <r>uilen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="z/ieden__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iedt</l>      <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieden</l>     <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieden</l>     <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oden</l>      <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ood</l>       <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ood</l>       <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ood</l>       <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iedend</l>    <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieden</l>     <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iedt</l>      <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iedt</l>      <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieden</l>     <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iede</l>      <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iede</l>      <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iede</l>      <r>ieden<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="z/uipen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>uip</l>       <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipt</l>      <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipen</l>     <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipen</l>     <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>open</l>      <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oop</l>       <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oop</l>       <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oop</l>       <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipend</l>    <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipen</l>     <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uip</l>       <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipt</l>      <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipt</l>      <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipen</l>     <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipe</l>      <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipe</l>      <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uipe</l>      <r>uipen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/ingen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingt</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ongen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ong</l>       <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ong</l>       <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ong</l>       <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingend</l>    <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingt</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingt</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingen</l>     <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="zieden">          <i>z</i><par n="z/ieden__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verwringen">      <i>verwr</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bekruipen">       <i>bekr</i><par n="z/uipen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verdringen">      <i>verdr</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bieden">          <i>b</i><par n="z/ieden__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zuipen">          <i>z</i><par n="z/uipen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gebieden">        <i>geb</i><par n="z/ieden__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kruipen">         <i>kr</i><par n="z/uipen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verschuilen">     <i>versch</i><par n="sch/uilen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="overbieden">      <i>overb</i><par n="z/ieden__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="schuilen">        <i>sch</i><par n="sch/uilen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sluipen">         <i>sl</i><par n="z/uipen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ontbieden">       <i>ontb</i><par n="z/ieden__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dwingen">         <i>dw</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bedingen">        <i>bed</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="springen">        <i>spr</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dingen">          <i>d</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ontspringen">     <i>ontspr</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zingen">          <i>z</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verzuipen">       <i>verz</i><par n="z/uipen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bespringen">      <i>bespr</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wringen">         <i>wr</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verbieden">       <i>verb</i><par n="z/ieden__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="druipen">         <i>dr</i><par n="z/uipen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vlieden">         <i>vl</i><par n="z/ieden__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dringen">         <i>dr</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bedwingen">       <i>bedw</i><par n="d/ingen__vblex"/></e>
